Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1518.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1506(a) and (a.1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1506. Application for driver's license or learner's permit.(a) Form and content.--Every application for a learner's permit or driver's license shall be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall contain such information as the department may require to determine the applicant's identity, competency and eligibility. The form shall allow for submission of a Social Security number or a taxpayer identification number. The form may also provide for inclusion of personal medical information and other information of use in an emergency.123456789101112131415161718 (a.1) Noncitizen application.--A person who is not a citizen of the United States may apply for a Pennsylvania REAL ID driver's license upon establishing the person's lawful presence in the United States and this Commonwealth[. The department may issue a license if the person will lawfully be in the United States for a period of one year or more after the date of the application or for a shorter period of time if deemed appropriate by the department.] and in accordance with the act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act.* * *Section 2. Section 1510(f) of Title 75 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(f) Waiver.--Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the department shall issue a non-REAL ID driver's license to an otherwise eligible person [who has no Social Security number if the person submits a waiver obtained from the Federal Government permitting him not to have a Social Security number.] to establish the eligible person's identity and State residency. The department may require other identifiers, including, but not limited to, a taxpayer identification number, before issuing the license. In accordance with 6 CFR 37.71(a)(1) (relating to driver's licenses and identification cards issued under section 202(d)(11) of the REAL ID Act), non-REAL ID licenses shall be clearly labeled with the words "Not for REAL ID Purposes."* * *(k) Privacy and confidentiality for non-REAL ID driver's licenses and photo identification cards.--20250HB1518PN1774 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Information and documents provided by applicants may not be used or disclosed to any individual or entity for immigration enforcement purposes unless necessary to comply with a court order or warrant signed by a judge appointed under Article III of the Constitution of the United States, or with a judicial subpoena for individual records, issued under the Pennsylvania Rules of Criminal Procedure or the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure. For the purposes of this paragraph, only those records, documents or information specifically sought by the court order, warrant or subpoena may be disclosed.(2) The department and an agent or employee of the department may not retain the documents or copies of documents presented by applicants for noncommercial driver's licenses or learner's permits which do not meet Federal standards for identification to prove age or identity except for a period necessary to ensure the validity and authenticity of the documents.(3) Records related to noncommercial driver's licenses, identification cards or learner's permits may not be disclosed or made accessible in any manner to an agency that primarily enforces Federal immigration laws or to an employer, agent or contractor of the agency unless the disclosure is necessary to comply with a court order or judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed under Article III of the Constitution of the United States, or judicial subpoena for individual records, issued under the Pennsylvania Rules of Criminal Procedure or the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.(4) A public or private agency or entity, including a 20250HB1518PN1774 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 third party other than the subject of the information, that has or seeks access to or receives records that include photographs, addresses, places of birth, countries of origin and driving histories shall certify to the department, before receipt or access, that the agency or entity will not use the records or information contained in the records for a purpose other than the purposes permitted under this subsection or disclose the records to a third party. This certification shall be in writing. In addition to a record required to be kept under 18 U.S.C. § 2721(c) (relating to prohibition on release and use of certain personal information from State motor vehicle records), an agency or entity certifying under this paragraph shall keep records of all uses and identifying each person or entity that received department records or information from the certifying agency or entity. The records shall be logged by the department and shall be available for inspection by the department upon its request.(5) A noncommercial driver's license or learner's permit which does not meet Federal standards for identification shall not be used as evidence of a person's citizenship or immigration status and shall not be the sole basis for investigating, arresting or detaining a person.(6) The department may not inquire about the citizenship or immigration status of an applicant for a noncommercial driver's license or learner's permit which does not meet Federal standards for identification, except that the department may inquire about whether the applicant is a citizen of the United States for purposes of complying with the obligations under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application).20250HB1518PN1774 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Section 1514(e) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1514. Expiration and renewal of drivers' licenses.* * *[(e) Noncitizen license expiration and renewal.--(1) Except as otherwise provided, a license issued on the basis of Immigration and Naturalization Service (INS) credentials or documents shall expire on the date appearing on the INS credentials or documents provided by the applicant under section 1506(a.1) (relating to application for driver's license or learner's permit).(2) If the expiration date of the INS credentials or documents exceeds four years, the license shall expire one day after the applicant's date of birth but not more than four years from the date of issuance of the license.(3) Upon presenting INS credentials or documents indicating continued legal presence in the United States, the person may apply for a renewal of the license.(4) If a person has been granted permanent legal status in the United States by the INS, the department may in its discretion require the person to present his INS credentials or documents for only the first license application or renewal.(5) License renewals issued under this subsection shall be for the length of time as set forth in paragraph (1) or (2).]Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1518PN1774 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526